New York, session 2025-2026, A11336.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The state law is amended by adding a new section 94 to read 2 as follows: 3 § 94. State flag for raising awareness of neurodiversity. The "Neuro- 4 diversity Strength Flag" shall be the official state flag for the rais- 5 ing of awareness of neurodiversity. Such flag shall be developed by the 6 autism spectrum disorders advisory board pursuant to section 13.42 of 7 the mental hygiene law and reviewed and updated as necessary. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01004-03-6